Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5474.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 34c. (1) The department, by contract or otherwise, shall assist prisoners with reentry into the community, including, but not limited to, doing both all of the following: (a) Assisting prisoners in obtaining the identification documents described in this section. (b) Subject to the department's security needs, reasonably allowing assisting prisoners to obtain in obtaining the following identification documents before those prisoners are released on parole or discharged upon completion of their maximum sentences: (i) Any of the identification documents that, in combination with the prisoner identification card issued under section 37(4), would satisfy the application requirements for obtaining an operator's license or official state personal identification card as established by the secretary of state under section 307 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.307, or section 1 of 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291. (ii) A social security Social Security card or social security Social Security number verification, if possible to obtain. (c) Not less than 60 days before a prisoner is scheduled to be released on parole or discharged upon completion of the prisoner's maximum sentence, collecting application documents, to the extent possible, and a photograph of the prisoner required for an operator's license or official state personal identification card as established by the secretary of state under section 307 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.307, or section 1 of 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291, as applicable, and sending the documents, photograph, and the projected date the prisoner will be released on parole or discharged upon completion of the prisoner's maximum sentence to the secretary of state. (2) A prisoner's refusal to obtain or attempt to obtain the documents identified in subsection (1)(b) may be included as part of the prisoner's parole eligibility report, as provided in section 35(7)(e). (3) This section applies to all prisoners who are serving a sentence under the jurisdiction of the department after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section February 23, 2012 who are eligible to obtain an operator's license under section 307 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.307, or a an official state personal identification card under section 1 of 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291. (4) The department shall include in writing to each prisoner the information described in section 14(9)(b) of chapter XI of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 771.14, listing the identification documents referenced in subsection (1). For a prisoner who begins serving a sentence under the jurisdiction of the department after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, February 23, 2012, the department shall provide that written information during reception center processing. For any prisoner who is under the jurisdiction of the department on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, February 23, 2012, the department shall provide that written information as follows: (a) For a prisoner with less than 1 year remaining before parole eligibility, within 90 days after that effective date. (b) For any other prisoner, the information shall be given at the time the parole eligibility report is prepared. (5) The department shall allow the secretary of state to have electronic access to prisoner information for the purpose of verifying the identity of prisoners who apply for driver licenses an operator's license or an official state personal identification cards.card. (6) The reentry success fund is created within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall must remain in the fund and shall not lapse to the general fund. The department of corrections shall expend money from the reentry success fund, upon appropriation, only for the expenses of performing the activities required by this section. (7) The department shall provide to an individual any operator's license or official state personal identification card that the department receives for that individual following an application to the secretary of state under subsection (1)(c). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02586'25) or House Bill No. 5477 (request no. H02586'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02763'25) or House Bill No. 5475 (request no. H02763'25).